District of Columbia statutes.
9-1203.06

Condemnation proceedings by railroad company.

The Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Washington Railroad Company, its successors or assigns, is authorized to acquire any land or property other than public grounds, space, or streets of the United States or the District of Columbia necessary or expedient for right-of-way for said track extensions, turnouts, branch tracks, spurs, sidings, and connections by purchase or condemnation. In event that said company, its successors or assigns, shall be unable to acquire any piece or parcel of land necessary or expedient for any of the purposes indicated in this subchapter, at a price deemed by it to be reasonable, then, and in such event The Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Washington Railroad Company, its successors and assigns, is authorized to acquire the same by condemnation proceedings to be instituted in its own name by petition filed in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia for the ascertainment of its value, in accordance with the provisions of §§ 16-1301 and 16-1311 to 16-1321.

June 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 323, ch. 269, § 6
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
Eminent domain, condemnation proceedings, see § 16-1301 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 7-1421.
1973 Ed., § 7-1221.